Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3534.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 200.02, subdivision 23, is amended to read: Subd. 23. Minor political party. (a) "Minor political party" means a political party that deleted text begin has adopted a state constitution, designated a state party chair, held a state convention in the last two years, fileddeleted text end new text begin maintains a party organization in the state, has complied with the party's constitution and rules, is in compliance with the requirements of section 202A.125, and filesnew text end with the secretary of state no later than December 31 following the most recent state general election a certification that the party has met the foregoing requirements, and met the requirements of paragraph (b) or (e), as applicable. (b) To be considered a minor party in all elections statewide, the political party must have presented at least one candidate: (1) for election to the office of governor and lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state auditor, or attorney general, at the last preceding state general election for those offices; or (2) for election to the office of presidential elector or U.S. senator at the preceding state general election for presidential electors; and (3) who received votes in each county that in the aggregate equal at least one percent of the total number of individuals who voted in the election, or its members must have presented to the secretary of state at any time before the close of filing for the state partisan primary ballot a nominating petition in a form prescribed by the secretary of state containing the valid signatures of party members in a number equal to at least one percent of the total number of individuals who voted in the preceding state general election. A signature is valid only if signed no more than one year prior to the date the petition was filed. (c) A political party whose candidate receives a sufficient number of votes at a state general election described in paragraph (b) becomes a minor political party as of January 1 following that election and retains its minor party status for at least two state general elections even if the party fails to present a candidate who receives the number and percentage of votes required under paragraph (b) at subsequent state general elections. (d) A minor political party whose candidates fail to receive the number and percentage of votes required under paragraph (b) at each of two consecutive state general elections described by paragraph (b) loses minor party status as of December 31 following the later of the two consecutive state general elections. (e) A minor party that qualifies to be a major party loses its status as a minor party at the time it becomes a major party. Votes received by the candidates of a major party must be counted in determining whether the party received sufficient votes to qualify as a minor party, notwithstanding that the party does not receive sufficient votes to retain its major party status. To be considered a minor party in an election in a legislative district, the political party must have presented at least one candidate for a legislative office in that district who received votes from at least ten percent of the total number of individuals who voted for that office, or its members must have presented to the secretary of state a nominating petition in a form prescribed by the secretary of state containing the valid signatures of party members in a number equal to at least ten percent of the total number of individuals who voted in the preceding state general election for that legislative office. A signature is valid only if signed no more than one year prior to the date the petition was filed. Sec. 2. new text begin [202A.125] MINOR POLITICAL PARTY STATE CONVENTION, AUTHORITY OF. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Time of convention. new text end new text begin The final authority over the affairs of each minor political party is vested in the party's state convention to be held at least once every two years at the call of the party's chair or state executive committee. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin State executive committee. new text end new text begin Subject to the control of the state convention, the general management and administrative affairs of the state party is vested in the party's executive committee. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Constitution, filing. new text end new text begin An officer of the state executive committee shall file with the secretary of state a copy of the party's constitution and all amendments to the constitution as they are enacted. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204B.03, is amended to read: 204B.03 MANNER OF NOMINATION. Candidates of a major political party for any partisan office except presidential elector and all candidates for nonpartisan office shall apply for a place on the primary ballot by filing an affidavit of candidacy as provided in section 204B.06, and except as otherwise provided in section 204D.07, subdivision 3, shall be nominated by primary. new text begin Candidates of a minor political party for any partisan office except presidential elector shall apply for a place on the general election ballot by filing an affidavit of candidacy as provided in section 204B.06. new text end Candidates for any partisan office who do not seek the nomination of a majornew text begin or minornew text end political party shall be nominated by nominating petition as provided in sections 204B.07 and 204B.08, and, except for presidential elector candidates, shall file an affidavit of candidacy as provided in section 204B.06. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204B.06, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Minor party candidates. new text end new text begin A candidate of a minor political party who seeks placement on the general election ballot for a partisan office shall state on the affidavit of candidacy that the candidate is a member of that party and has received the endorsement of the party. The candidate filing shall include a nomination certificate, prepared under the direction of and executed by the chair and secretary of the political party, stating the nominated candidate has been selected under the rules of the party. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 204B.07, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Petitions for presidential electors and alternates. (a) This section does not apply to candidates for presidential elector or alternate nominated by major political partiesnew text begin or minor political partiesnew text end . Major party candidates new text begin and minor party candidates new text end for presidential elector or alternate are certified under section 208.03. Other presidential electors or alternates are nominated by petition pursuant to this section. (b) On petitions nominating presidential electors or alternates, the names of the candidates for president and vice-president shall be added to the political party or political principle stated on the petition. One petition may be filed to nominate a slate of presidential electors equal in number to the number of electors to which the state is entitled and an alternate for each elector nominee. (c) In addition to the petition, each nominated candidate must submit a signed, notarized affidavit of candidacy for president or vice president that includes the following information: (1) the candidate's name in the form as it should appear on the ballot; (2) the candidate's campaign address, website, phone number, and email address; (3) the name of the political party or political principle stated on the petition; (4) the office sought by the candidate; and (5) a declaration that the candidate is aware of and will follow all applicable election laws and campaign finance laws. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204B.09, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Candidates in state and county general elections. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this subdivision, affidavits of candidacy and nominating petitions for county, state, and federal offices filled at the state general election shall be filed not more than 84 days nor less than 70 days before the state primary. The affidavit may be prepared and signed at any time between 60 days before the filing period opens and the last day of the filing period. (b) Notwithstanding other law to the contrary, the affidavit of candidacy must be signed in the presence of a notarial officer or an individual authorized to administer oaths under section 358.10. (c) This provision does not apply to candidates for presidential elector nominated by major political partiesnew text begin or minor political partiesnew text end . Major party candidates new text begin and minor party candidates new text end for presidential elector are certified under section 208.03. Other candidates for presidential electors may file petitions at least 77 days before the general election day pursuant to section 204B.07. Nominating petitions to fill vacancies in nominations shall be filed as provided in section 204B.13. No affidavit or petition shall be accepted later than 5:00 p.m. on the last day for filing. (d) Affidavits and petitions for county offices must be filed with the county auditor of that county. Affidavits and petitions for federal offices must be filed with the secretary of state. Affidavits and petitions for state offices must be filed with the secretary of state or with the county auditor of the county in which the candidate maintains residence. (e) Affidavits other than those filed pursuant to subdivision 1a must be submitted by mail or by hand, notwithstanding chapter 325L, or any other law to the contrary and must be received by 5:00 p.m. on the last day for filing. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204B.12, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Before primary. A new text begin major political party new text end candidate may withdraw from the primary ballot by filing an affidavit of withdrawal with the same official who received the affidavit of candidacy. new text begin A minor political party candidate may withdraw from the general election ballot by filing an affidavit of withdrawal with the same official who received the affidavit of candidacy. new text end The affidavit shall request that official to withdraw the candidate's name from the ballot and shall be filed no later than two days after the last day for filing for the office. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204B.13, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Partisan office. (a) A vacancy in nomination for a partisan office must be filled in the manner provided by this section. A vacancy in nomination exists for a partisan office when a major political party candidate who has been nominated in accordance with section 204D.03, subdivision 3, or 204D.10, subdivision 1new text begin , or a minor political party candidate has been nominated in accordance with sections 204B.06, subdivision 2a, and 204D.12, clause (2)new text end : (1) dies; (2) withdraws by filing an affidavit of withdrawal, as provided in paragraph (b), at least one day prior to the general election with the same official who received the affidavit of candidacy; or (3) is determined to be ineligible to hold the office the candidate is seeking, pursuant to a court order issued under section 204B.44. (b) An affidavit of withdrawal filed under paragraph (a), clause (2), must state that the candidate has been diagnosed with a catastrophic illness that will permanently and continuously incapacitate the candidate and prevent the candidate from performing the duties of the office sought, if elected. The affidavit must be accompanied by a certificate verifying the candidate's illness meets the requirements of this paragraph, signed by at least two licensed physicians. The affidavit and certificate may be filed by the candidate or the candidate's legal guardian. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204B.13, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Partisan office; nomination by party; special election. (a) Except as provided in subdivision 5, a major new text begin or minor new text end political party may fill a vacancy in nomination of that party's candidate as defined in subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (1), (2), or (3), by filing one nomination certificate with the same official who received the affidavits of candidacy for that office. A major political party may provide in its governing rules a procedure, including designation of an appropriate committee, to fill a vacancy in nomination for any federal or state partisan office. The nomination certificate shall be prepared under the direction of and executed by the chair and secretary of the political party and filed within the timelines established in this section. When filing the certificate the chair and secretary shall attach an affidavit stating that the newly nominated candidate has been selected under the rules of the party and that the individuals signing the certificate and making the affidavit are the chair and secretary of the party. (b) In the case of a vacancy in nomination for partisan office that occurs on or before the 79th day before the general election, the major new text begin or minor new text end political party must file the nomination certificate no later than 71 days before the general election. The name of the candidate nominated by the party must appear on the general election ballot. (c) Except as provided in subdivision 5, in the case of a vacancy in nomination new text begin of a major political party candidate new text end for a partisan office that occurs after the 79th day before the general election, the general election ballot shall remain unchanged, but the county and state canvassing boards must not certify the vote totals for that office from the general election, and the office must be filled at a special election held in accordance with this section. Except for the vacancy in nomination, all other candidates whose names appeared on the general election ballot for the office must appear on the special election ballot for the office. New affidavits of candidacy or nominating petitions may not be accepted, and there must not be a primary to fill the vacancy in nomination. The major political party may file a nomination certificate as provided in paragraph (a) no later than seven days after the general election. On the date of the general election, the county auditor or municipal clerk shall post a notice in each precinct affected by a vacancy in nomination under this paragraph, informing voters of the reason for the vacancy in nomination and the procedures for filling the vacancy in nomination and conducting a special election as required by this section. The secretary of state shall prepare and electronically distribute the notice to county auditors in each county affected by a vacancy in nomination. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204B.13, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Candidates for governor and lieutenant governor. (a) If a vacancy in nomination for a major new text begin or minor new text end political party occurs in the race for governor, the political party must nominate the candidates for both governor and lieutenant governor. If a vacancy in nomination for a major new text begin or minor new text end political party occurs in the race for lieutenant governor, the candidate for governor shall select the candidate for lieutenant governor. (b) For a vacancy in nomination for lieutenant governor that occurs on or before the 79th day before the general election, the name of the lieutenant governor candidate must be submitted by the governor candidate to the filing officer no later than 71 days before the general election. If the vacancy in nomination for lieutenant governor occurs after the 79th day before the general election, the candidate for governor shall submit the name of the new lieutenant governor candidate to the secretary of state within seven days after the vacancy in nomination occurs, but no changes may be made to the general election ballots. (c) When a vacancy in nomination for lieutenant governor occurs after the 79th day before the general election, the county auditor or municipal clerk shall post a notice in each precinct affected by the vacancy in nomination. The secretary of state shall prepare and electronically distribute the notice to county auditors. The county auditor must ensure that each precinct in the county receives the notice prior to the opening of the polls on election day. The notice must include: (1) a statement that there is a vacancy in nomination for lieutenant governor and the statutory reason for the vacancy in nomination as provided in subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (1), (2), or (3); (2) a statement that the results for the governor and lieutenant governor will be counted and that no special election will be held for that race; and (3) a list of all candidates in the governor and lieutenant governor's race, listed in order of the base rotation. The listing of candidates shall include the name of the candidate to fill the vacancy in nomination for lieutenant governor. If the name of the candidate has not yet been named, then the list must include the date by which the candidate will be named. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204D.07, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Exception; new text begin minor political parties; new text end petition candidates. The name of new text begin a minor political party candidate or new text end a candidate nominated by petition shall not be placed on any state primary ballot. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204D.12, is amended to read: 204D.12 NAMES PLACED ON GENERAL ELECTION BALLOTS. Without payment of an additional fee, the county auditor shall place on the appropriate state general election ballot the name of every candidate: (1) whose nomination at the state primary has been certified by the appropriate canvassing board; new text begin (2) who has received the nomination and endorsement of a minor political party and has been certified by the secretary of state; new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end who has been nominated by petition, including candidates certified by the secretary of state; and deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end who was nominated and whose name was omitted from the state nonpartisan primary ballot pursuant to section 204D.07, subdivision 3. Only the names of duly nominated candidates may be placed on a ballot. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204D.13, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Order of candidates for president and vice president. The first name printed for president and vice president of the United States on the state general election ballot shall be that of the candidate of the major political party that received the smallest average number of votes at the last state general election. The succeeding names shall be those of the candidates of the other major political parties that received a succeedingly higher average number of votes respectively. For the purposes of this subdivision, the average number of votes of a major political party shall be computed by dividing the total number of votes counted for all of the party's candidates for statewide office at the state general election by the number of those candidates at the election. The names of candidates nominated by petition for president and vice president shall be placed on the state general election ballot after the names of the candidates for that office who were nominated by major political partiesnew text begin and the minor political partiesnew text end . No later than 11 weeks before the state general election, the secretary of state shall determine by lot the order of candidates nominated by petition. The drawing of lots must be by political party or principle. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 208.03, is amended to read: 208.03 NOMINATION OF PRESIDENTIAL ELECTORS AND ALTERNATES. Presidential electors and alternates for the major political parties of this state shall be nominated by delegate conventions called and held under the supervision of the respective state central committees of the parties of this state. new text begin Presidential electors and alternates for the minor political parties of this state shall be nominated by the state executive committees of the parties. new text end At least 71 days before the general election day the chair of the major political party new text begin or minor political party new text end shall certify to the secretary of state the names of the persons nominated as presidential electors, the names of persons nominated as alternate presidential electors, and the names of the party candidates for president and vice president. The chair shall also certify that the party candidates for president and vice president have no affidavit on file as a candidate for any office in this state at the ensuing general election. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 208.04, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Form of presidential ballots. When presidential electors and alternates are to be voted for, a vote cast for the party candidates for president and vice president shall be deemed a vote for that party's electors and alternates as filed with the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall certify the names of all duly nominated presidential and vice presidential candidates to the county auditors of the counties of the state. Each county auditor, subject to the rules of the secretary of state, shall cause the names of the candidates of each major political party new text begin or minor political party new text end and the candidates nominated by petition to be set in type of the same size and style as for candidates on the state general election ballot, before the party designation. To the left of, and on the same line with the names of the candidates for president and vice president, near the margin, shall be placed an oval or similar target shape, in which the voters may indicate their choice. The form for the presidential ballot and the relative position of the several candidates shall be determined by the rules applicable to other state officers. The state ballot, with the required heading, shall be printed on the same piece of paper and shall be below the presidential ballot with a blank space between one inch in width. Sec. 16. new text begin CITATION.new text end new text begin This act may be referred to as the "Minor Party Ballot Access Act." new text end Sec. 17. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This act is effective for elections occurring after November 3, 2026. new text end